Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1544YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 43 Section 1. Section 692A.102, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (06) Electronic transmission of sexually 3 explicit picture or video in violation of section 709.9A. 4 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 709.9A Electronic transmission of 5 sexually explicit visual material. 6 A person who is eighteen years of age or older commits a 7 serious misdemeanor if the person knowingly sends a picture 8 or video, which the person knows or reasonably should know 9 is unsolicited, by electronic means depicting any of the 10 following: 11 1. Any personâs genitals or pubic area. 12 2. Any person engaging in a sex act, as defined in section 13 702.17. 14 3. The covered genitals of a male person that are in a 15 discernibly turgid state. 16